Louisiana, session 2026, HB860.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2212(B)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2212. Advertisement and letting to lowest responsible and responsive bidder;
public work; electronic bidding; participation in mentor-protégé program;
exemptions; subpoena
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) Any Except as otherwise provided in this Section, any public entity
advertising for public work shall use only the Louisiana Uniform Bid Form as
promulgated in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act by the division
of administration, office of facility planning and control. A public entity may use
a fillable electronic bid form to facilitate the receipt of bids through an electronic
bidding platform if the fillable electronic bid form includes all of the text and input
fields contained in the Louisiana Uniform Bid Form. A public entity shall not add
any bidder requirements or bidder input fields to a fillable electronic bid form that
are not contained in the Louisiana Uniform Bid Form. Deviations in the formatting
of a fillable electronic bid form used by a public entity from the formatting of the
Louisiana Uniform Bid Form shall not constitute a violation of this Section. The
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 860 ENROLLED
bidding documents shall require only the following information and documentation
to be submitted by a bidder at the time designated in the advertisement for bid
opening: Bid Security or Bid Bond; Acknowledgment of Addenda; Base Bid;
Alternates; Signature of Bidder; Name, Title, and Address of Bidder; Name of Firm
or Joint Venture; Corporate Resolution or written evidence of the authority of the
person signing the bid; and Louisiana Contractors License Number, and on public
works projects where unit prices are utilized, a section on the bid form where the unit
price utilized in the bid shall be set forth including a description for each unit;
however, unit prices shall not be utilized for the construction of building projects,
unless the unit prices and their extensions are incorporated into the base bid or
alternates. If a public entity adds any additional requirements for information, unless
mandated by state or federal requirements, the requirements shall be void and not
considered in the award of the contract. Any timely change by a bidder to the bid
prior to submission of the bid shall be scratched through and initialed by the bidder
or the person who submits the bid. The change as initialed shall be binding.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.